Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5488.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 20950. (1) An individual shall not practice or advertise to practice as a medical first responder, emergency medical technician, emergency medical technician specialist, paramedic, or emergency medical services instructor-coordinator unless the individual is licensed by the department under this section. (2) The department shall issue a license under this section only to an individual who meets all of the following requirements: (a) Is 18 years of age or older.Meets 1 of the requirements described in section 20950a. (b) Meets either of the following requirements: (i) Has successfully completed the appropriate education program approved under section 20912. (ii) While serving as a member of the armed forces, served as a military health care specialist and was separated from service with an honorable character of service or under an honorable conditions (general) character of service in the 2-year period preceding the date the license application is filed. The applicant shall provide a form DD214, form DD215, or any other form that is satisfactory to the department to meet the criteria established in this subparagraph. This subparagraph only applies to an applicant for a license as an emergency medical technician. (c) Subject to subsection (3), has attained a passing score on the appropriate department prescribed examination, as follows: (i) A medical first responder must pass the written examination proctored by the department or the department's designee and a practical examination approved by the department. The instructors of the medical first responder course shall administer the practical examination. The department or the department's designee may also proctor the practical examination. The individual shall pay the fee for the written examination required under this subparagraph directly to the National Registry of Emergency Medical Technicians or other organization approved by the department. As used in this subparagraph, "examination" means an evaluation approved or developed by the National Registry of Emergency Medical Technicians or another organization with equivalent national recognition and expertise in emergency medical services personnel testing and approved by the department. (ii) An emergency medical technician or emergency medical technician specialist must pass the written examination proctored by the department or the department's designee and a practical examination proctored by the department or the department's designee. The individual shall pay the fee for the written examination required under this subparagraph directly to the National Registry of Emergency Medical Technicians or other organization approved by the department. As used in this subparagraph, "examination" means an evaluation approved or developed by the National Registry of Emergency Medical Technicians or another organization with equivalent national recognition and expertise in emergency medical services personnel testing and approved by the department. (iii) A paramedic must pass either of the following: (A) A written and practical examination developed or prescribed by the department other than an examination defined in sub-subparagraph (B). (B) The written examination proctored by the department or the department's designee and a practical examination proctored by the department or the department's designee. An individual who takes the examination described in this sub-subparagraph shall pay the fee for the examination directly to the National Registry of Emergency Medical Technicians or another organization approved by the department. As used in this sub-subparagraph, "examination" means an evaluation approved or developed by the National Registry of Emergency Medical Technicians or another organization with equivalent national recognition and expertise in emergency medical services personnel testing and approved by the department. (d) Meets other requirements of this part. (3) The department shall require for purposes of compliance with subsection (2)(c) successful passage by each first-time applicant of the applicable examination described in that subsection. Not later than 2 years after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this sentence, the department shall develop or prescribe the examination described in subsection (2)(c)(iii)(A). (4) The department shall issue a license as an emergency medical services instructor-coordinator only to an individual who meets the requirements of subsection (2) for an emergency medical services instructor-coordinator and at the time of application is currently licensed as a medical first responder, emergency medical technician, emergency medical technician specialist, or paramedic and has at least 3 years' field experience with a licensed life support agency as a medical first responder, emergency medical technician, emergency medical technician specialist, or paramedic. The department shall provide for the development and administration of an examination for emergency medical services instructor-coordinators. The license must specify the level of instruction-coordination the individual is licensed to provide. An emergency medical services instructor-coordinator shall not instruct or coordinate emergency medical training courses at a level that exceeds his or her the emergency medical services instructor-coordinator's designated level of licensure and for which he or she the emergency medical services instructor-coordinator does not have at least 3 years' field experience at that level of licensure. (5) Except as otherwise provided in section 20952, a license under this section is effective for 3 years from the date of issuance unless revoked or suspended by the department. (6) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an applicant for licensure under this section shall pay the following triennial licensure fees: (a) Medical first responder - no fee. (b) Emergency medical technician - $40.00. (c) Emergency medical technician specialist - $60.00. (d) Paramedic - $80.00. (e) Emergency medical services instructor-coordinator - $100.00. (7) If a life support agency certifies to the department that an applicant for licensure under this section will act as a volunteer and if the life support agency does not charge for its services, the department shall not require the applicant to pay the fee required under subsection (6). If the applicant ceases to meet the definition of a volunteer under this part at any time during the effective period of his or her the applicant's license and is employed as a licensee under this part, the applicant shall at that time pay the fee required under subsection (6). (8) The department shall waive the fee required under subsection (6) for the initial license if the applicant for initial licensure was separated from service with an honorable character of service or under honorable conditions (general) character of service in the armed forces. The applicant shall provide a form DD214, form DD215, or any other form that is satisfactory to the department to be eligible for the waiver of the fee under this subsection. (9) The department may charge a fee for an applicant taking the examination described in section 20950(2)(c)(iii)(A), subsection (2)(c)(iii)(A) in an amount that does not exceed the fee for an applicant taking the examination described in section 20950(2)(c)(iii)(B).subsection (2)(c)(iii)(B). (10) As used in this section, "armed forces" means that term as defined in section 16103. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5489 (request no. H00091'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.